Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.157

Home visitation programs—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW * 43.215.145, * 43.215.147, and ** 43.121.185 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the population.

(2) "Home visitation" means providing services in the permanent or temporary residence, or in other familiar surroundings, of the family receiving such services.

(3) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based practices.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 6; 2007 c 466 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.215.146, 43.121.175.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 43.215.145 and 43.215.147 were recodified as RCW 43.216.155 and 43.216.159, respectively, pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 821, effective July 1, 2018.

**(2) RCW 43.121.185 was repealed by 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 12, effective June 30, 2012.

Transition plan—Report to the legislature—2011 1st sp.s. c 32: See note following RCW 70.305.005.